Utah statutes.
41-1a-231.    Special mobile equipment status.

(1)  "Special mobile equipment" status as defined under Section 41-1a-102 shall be approved by the Department of Transportation in consultation with the Motor Carrier Advisory Board created under Section 72-9-201.

(2)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the Department of Transportation in consultation with the State Tax Commission shall make rules establishing procedures for application, identification, approval, denial, and appeal of special mobile equipment status.

